Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2240
Civil action; settlement; payment
of costs.

The
parties to a civil action may, as part of a settlement of the action, agree
to the payment of costs of the action.

Laws 2009, LB35, § 12.